District of Columbia statutes.
7-1606

Rules.

The Mayor may issue rules necessary to implement this subchapter pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

June 10, 1986, D.C. Law 6-121, § 7, 33 DCR 2451
1981 Ed., § 6-2806.
For temporary addition of chapter, see § 2-4 of the HIV Testing of Certain Criminal Offenders Emergency Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-318, November 24, 1992, 39 DCR 9016).